Utah statutes.
72-12-102.   Legislative findings and policy.
(1)  The Legislature finds that:
(a)  increasingly heavy commuting burdens on Utah's freeways and major
transportation arteries are gradually aggravating driving conditions for all
Utah motorists;
(b)  single-occupant driving is the predominant mode of transportation used by
commuters in Utah;
(c)  single-occupant driving represents the most costly and most excessive use
of dwindling petroleum reserves; and
(d)  rapidly increasing energy costs represent an ever-growing burden on
commuters' work-related expenses.
(2)  The policy of this state is to support and encourage transportation modes
and ride-sharing programs that reduce the number of vehicle miles traveled,
thereby reducing gasoline consumption and protecting the environment.
